test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_NoExtra_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodinaanibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodinaanibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodiwaaibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodiwaaibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodiwaaibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodiniibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodiniibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodiniibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodinaanibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodinaanibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodinaanibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+PosPl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodiwaaibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+PosPl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodiwaaibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+PosPl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodiwaaibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+PosObv+Pret+Obv: omashkimodiniibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+PosObv+Pret+Pl: omashkimodiniibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+PosObv+Pret+Loc: omashkimodiniibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: mashkimodensimishinaan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: mashkimodensimishiwaa
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: mashkimodensimishini
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: mashkimodenhimishinaan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: mashkimodenhimishiwaa
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: mashkimodenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: mashkimodensimishiban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: mashkimodensimish***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: mashkimodenhimishiban
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: mashkimodenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: mashkimodensimishan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: mashkimodensimishag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: mashkimodensimishing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: mashkimodenhimishan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: mashkimodenhimishag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: mashkimodenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodensiminaaniban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodensiminaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodensimiwaaiban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodensiminiiban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodensimini***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodenhiminaaniban
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodenhimiwaaiban
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodenhiminiiban
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodensiminaanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodensiminaanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodensiminaaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodensimiwaaan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodensimiwaaag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodensimiwaaing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodensiminian
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodensiminiag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: mashkimodensiminiing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodenhiminaanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodenhiminaanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodenhiminaaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimiwaaan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimiwaaag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimiwaaing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodenhiminian
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodenhiminiag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: mashkimodenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensimibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensimibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensimibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensim***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensim***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensim***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhimibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhimibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhimibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhim***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhim***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodensishinaaniban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodensishinaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodensishiwaaiban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodensishiniiban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodensishini***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodenhishinaaniban
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodenhishiwaaiban
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodenhishiniiban
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodensishinaanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodensishinaanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodensishinaaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodensishiwaaan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodensishiwaaag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodensishiwaaing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodensishinian
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodensishiniag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: mashkimodensishiniing
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodenhishinaanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodenhishinaanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodenhishinaaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodenhishiwaaan
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodenhishiwaaag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodenhishiwaaing
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodenhishinian
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodenhishiniag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: mashkimodenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensishibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensishibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensishibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensish***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensish***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensish***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhishibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhishibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhishibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhish***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhish***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensinaanibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensinaanibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensinaanibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensinaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensiniibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensiniibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensiniibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhinaanibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhinaanibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhinaanibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhiniibanan
     mashkimod+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhiniibanag
     mashkimod+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhiniibaning
     mashkimod+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodimishinaaniban
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodimishinaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodimishiwaaiban
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodimishiniiban
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodimishinaanan
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodimishinaanag
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodimishinaaning
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodimishiwaaan
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodimishiwaaag
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodimishiwaaing
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodimishinian
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodimishiniag
